Nevada, session 83, AB324.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 116.3113 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
116.3113 1. Commencing not later than the time of the first
conveyance of a unit to a person other than a declarant, the
association shall maintain, to the extent reasonably available and
subject to reasonable deductibles, all of the following:
(a) Property insurance on the common elements and, in a
planned community, also on property that must become common
elements, insuring against risks of direct physical loss commonly
-
*AB324*

– 2 –
insured against, which insurance, after application of any
deductibles, must be not less than 80 percent of the actual cash value
of the insured property at the time the insurance is purchased and at
each renewal date, exclusive of land, excavations, foundations and
other items normally excluded from property policies.
(b) Commercial general liability insurance, including insurance
for medical payments, in an amount determined by the executive
board but not less than any amount specified in the declaration,
covering all occurrences commonly insured against for bodily injury
and property damage arising out of or in connection with the use,
ownership, or maintenance of the common elements and, in
cooperatives, also of all units.
(c) Crime insurance which includes coverage for dishonest acts
by members of the executive board and the officers, employees,
agents, directors and volunteers of the association and which
extends coverage to any business entity that acts as the community
manager of the association and the employees of that entity. Such
insurance may not contain a conviction requirement, and the
minimum amount of the policy must be not less than an amount
equal to 3 months of aggregate assessments on all units plus reserve
funds or $5,000,000, whichever is less.
(d) Directors and officers insurance that is a nonprofit
organization errors and omissions policy in a minimum aggregate
amount of not less than $1,000,000 naming the association as the
owner and the named insured. The coverage must extend to the
members of the executive board and the officers, employees, agents,
directors and volunteers of the association and to the community
manager of the association and any employees thereof while acting
as agents as insured persons under the policy terms. Coverage must
be subject to the terms listed in the declaration.
2. In the case of a building that contains units divided by
[horizontal] :
(a) Horizontal boundaries described in the declaration, [or
vertical boundaries that comprise common walls between units,] the
insurance maintained under paragraph (a) of subsection 1, to the
extent reasonably available, must include the units, but need not
include improvements and betterments installed by units’ owners.
(b) Vertical boundaries that comprise common walls between
units, the insurance maintained under paragraph (a) of subsection
1 may, but need not, include the units.
3. If the insurance described in subsections 1 and 2 is not
reasonably available, the association promptly shall cause notice of
that fact to be given to all units’ owners. The declaration may
require the association to carry any other insurance, and the
-
*AB324*

– 3 –
association may carry any other insurance it considers appropriate to
protect the association or the units’ owners.
4. An insurance policy issued to the association does not
prevent a unit’s owner from obtaining insurance for the unit’s
owner’s own benefit.
H
-
*AB324*